Utah statutes.
32A-1-108.   Director of alcoholic beverage control.
(1) (a)  The commission by a vote of four of the five commissioners, with the
approval of the governor, shall appoint a director of alcoholic beverage
control who is the administrative head of the department.
(b)  The director serves at the pleasure of the commission, except that the
director may only be removed from office by a vote of four commissioners.
(c)  The director may not be a member of the commission.
(d)  The director shall:
(i)  be qualified in administration;
(ii)  be knowledgeable by experience and training in the field of business
management; and
(iii)  possess any other qualifications prescribed by the commission.
(2)  The director's compensation shall be established by the governor within
the salary range fixed by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22, State
Officer Compensation.
(3)  The director shall:
(a)  carry out the policies of the commission and those of the department;
(b)  keep the commission fully informed of all operations and administrative
activities of the department; and
(c)  assist the commission in the proper discharge of its duties and
responsibilities.
